Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Cross references.

Filing false liens or encumbrances against public employees, §

16-10-20.1

.

Impersonating a public officer or employee, §

16-10-23

.

Rights of public officers and employees absent on military duty as members of organized militia or reserve forces, §

38-2-279

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Pensions and Chapter 9:
Can Municipalities Use Bankruptcy to Solve Their Pension Woes?,”
see 27 Emory Bankr. Dev. J. 365 (2011).

For article, “Solving Insolvent Public Pensions:
The Limitations of the Current Bankruptcy Option,” see 28 Emory Bankr. Dev. J. 89 (2011).

For article, “Public Officers and Employees:
Employees’ Insurance and Benefit Plans,” see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 177 (2014).

For note, “Name-Clearing Hearings:
How this ‘Remedy’ Fails to Safeguard the Procedural Due Process Rights of Public Employees Accused of Sexual Harassment,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1389 (2010).

For note, “State of the Unions: The Impact of Janus on Public University Student Fees,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 735 (2020).